Missouri, session 2026, SB1540.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
1
Section A. Sections 67.601, 67.604, 67.607, 67.651,
2
67.652, 67.653, 67.657, and 99.585, RSMo, are repealed and nine
3
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
4
67.601, 67.604, 67.607, 67.618, 67.651, 67.652, 67.653, 67.657,
5
and 99.585, to read as follows:
1
67.601. 1. In each constitutional charter city not
2
within a cou n ty a nd each constitutional charter county
3
adjoining such city there is hereby established a "Regional
4
Convention and Visitors Commission"[, to consist of eleven
5
members, five of whom shall be appointed by the chief
6
executive of the city and six of whom shall be appointed by
7
the chief executive of the county. Of the members so
8
appointed, two members appointed b y the county executive and
9
only two members and one member appointed by the city
10
executive and only one member shall be representatives of
11
the hotel and motel industry, one member appointed by the
12
city executive shall be a representative of the restaurant
13
industry, and one member appointed by the city executive
14
shall be a representative from a major tourist attraction.
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1540 2
15
Of the members first appointed, two members and only two
16
members appointed by the city executive and two members
17
appointed by the county executive shall be appointed for a
18
term of three years, two members appointed by the city
19
executive and two members appointed by the county executive
20
shall be appointed for a term of two years, and one member
21
appointed by the city executive and two members appointed by
22
the county executive shall be appointed for a term of one
23
year. Thereafter, each member appointed shall serve a four-
24
year t erm. The chief executive of the city and the chief
25
executive o f the county shall designate, in alternate years,
26
one of the members appointed by him to be chairman. All
27
members shall serve without compensation. Any vacan c y shall
28
be filled by the respective chief executi v e officer. The
29
commission shall elect its own treasurer, secretary a nd such
30
other officers as it deems necessary and expedient, and it
31
may make such rules, regulations, and bylaws consistent with
32
sections 67.601 to 67.626 to effectuate its purposes as it
33
deems necessary.
34
2. Any provision of subsection 1 of this section to
35
the con t rary notwithstanding, the terms of all members of
36
the regional convention and visitors commission established
37
by subsection 1 of this section shall terminate August 28,
38
1991. Thereafter, such regional convention and visitors
39
commi s sion shall consist of eleven members, five of whom
40
shall be appointed by the chief executive of the city with
41
the approval of the governing body of the city, five of whom
42
shall be appointed by the chief executive of the county, and
43
one of whom shall be appointed by the governor from a panel
44
of three nominees submitted jointly by the city executive
45
and the county executive and who shall serve as chairman.
46
Of the members so appointed not less than three members

SB 1540 3
47
appointed by the county executive and not less than three
48
members appointed by the city executive shall be individuals
49
actively engaged in the hotel and motel industry and one
50
member appointed by the city executive shall be a
51
representative of the restaurant industry. Of the members
52
first appointed, two members appointed by t he city executive
53
and two members appointed by the county executive shall be
54
appointed for a term of three years, two members appointed
55
by the city executive and two members appointed by the
56
county executive shall be appointed for a term of two years,
57
and one member appointed by the city executive and one
58
member appointed by the county executive shall be appointed
59
for a term of one year. Thereafter, each member appointed
60
by the city executive o r the county executive shall serve a
61
four-year term. The member appointed by the governor shall
62
serve a two-yea r term. All members shall serve without
63
compensation. Any vaca n cy shall be filled by the respective
64
chief executi v e officer. The commission shall elect its own
65
treasurer, secretary and such other officers as it deems
66
necessary and expedient, and it may make such rules,
67
regulations and bylaws consistent with sections 67.601 to
68
67.626 to effectuate its purposes as it deems necessary.
69
3. In the event the state of Missouri or the city or
70
the cou n ty fails to make any appropriation or to pay any
71
rents, fees or charges provided in any lease among the
72
regional convention and sports complex authority established
73
by section 67.650 and the state of Missouri, the city and
74
the county, of a facility of such authority with respect to
75
which the regional convention and visitors commission has
76
contracted to provide operations or management services, the
77
member of the regional convention and visitors commission
78
appointed by the governor, if the state of Missouri has

SB 1540 4
79
failed to make such appropriation or to pay such rents, fees
80
or charges, and the members of such commission appointed by
81
the chief executive of the city or county, if the city or
82
county, as applicable, has failed to make such appropriation
83
or to pay such rents, fees or charges, shall be disqualified
84
from voting on any matter, action or resolution to come
85
before such commission, and from participating in any of the
86
business of such commission, so long as any such failure
87
continues. If less than a majority of the members then
88
appointed a re thereby qualified to vote, the members that
89
remain qualified to vote shall constitute a quorum and any
90
action of the commission which is approved by a majority of
91
such qualified members shall be binding upon the
92
commission]. Beginning August 28, 2026, the commission
93
shall consis t of fifteen members, five of whom shall be
94
appointed by the chief executive of the city, five of whom
95
shall be appointed by the chief executive of the county, and
96
five of whom shall be appointed by the governor. One of the
97
gubernatorial appointees shall be appointed by t h e governor
98
to serve as the chairman of the commission. Of the members
99
so appointed, three members appointed by th e governor shall
100
be a representative of the hotel and motel industry, three
101
members appointed by the county executive and three members
102
appointed by the city executive shall be representatives of
103
the hotel and motel industry, one member appointed by the
104
city executive shall be a representative of the restaurant
105
industry, and one member appointed by the city executive
106
shall be a representative from a major tourist attraction.
107
Except as set forth in subsection 2 of this section, each
108
member appointed shall serve a four-year term. All members
109
shall serve without compensation. Any vacancy s hall be
110
filled by the respective chief ex e cutive officer or

SB 1540 5
111
governor, as applicable. The commission shall elect its own
112
treasurer, secretary, and such other officers as it deems
113
necessary and expedient, and it may make such rules,
114
regulations, and bylaws consistent with sections 67.601 to
115
67.626 and sections 67.650 to 67.658 to effectuate its
116
purposes as it deems necessary. The commission shall be a
117
body corporate and political su b division of the state of
118
Missouri.
119
2. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection 1 of
120
this se c tion to the contrary, all members of the regional
121
convention and visitors commission serving on the board of
122
commissioners as of August 28, 2026, shall remain as members
123
of the board of commissioners of the regional convention and
124
visitors commission, and shall continue to serve until the
125
expiration of the term for which they were appointed, or
126
until their successors are duly appointed and qualified.
127
The four additional members of the commission to be adde d as
128
of August 28, 2026, shall be appointees of the governor and
129
shall be selected from the commissioners appointed by the
130
governor serving as commissioners of the regional convention
131
and sports complex authority created in section 67.650
132
immediately prior to their appointment to the commission.
133
Of the members so appointed as of August 28, 2026, two
134
members shall be appointed for four-year terms, one member
135
shall appointed for a two-year term, and one member shall be
136
appointed for a one-year term. Thereafter, all such
137
appointments or reappointments shall be for a period of four
138
years.
1
67.604. For purposes of sections 67.601 to 67.626, the
2
following te r ms mean:
3
(1) "Business", any activity engaged in by any person,
4
or cause d to be engaged in by him, with the object of gain,

SB 1540 6
5
benefit or advantage, either direct or indirect, and the
6
classification of which business is of such a character as
7
to be subject to the terms of sections 67.601 to 67.626;
8
(2) "City", a constitutional charter city not within a
9
county;
10
(3) "Commission", the regional convention and visitors
11
commissi o n created in section 67.601;
12
(4) "Convention district", the real property located
13
in the c i ty or the county that contains an existing
14
convention center, sports stadium, sports practice facility
15
and field houses, playing fields, outdoor convention,
16
recreational, and entertainment facilities and centers, and
17
parking facilities that is leased, owned, maintained, or
18
operated by or on behalf of the commission, including any
19
expansion or acquisition thereof, which shall immediately
20
become a part of the convention district;
21
(5) "County", a constitutional charter county
22
adjoinin g a constitutional charter city not within a county;
23
[(5)] (6) "District", the regional cultural and
24
performing art s development district created in section
25
67.627;
26
(7) "Election authority", the election authority
27
having j u risdiction over the area in which the boundaries of
28
the convention district are located pursuant to chapter 115;
29
[(6)] (8) "Hotel and motel industry", the group of
30
enterprise s ac t ively engaged in the business of operating
31
lodging facilities for transient guests;
32
[(7)] (9) "Person", any individual, firm,
33
copartners hip, joint venture, association, corporation
34
whether municipal or private and whether organized for
35
profit or not, estate, trust, business trust, receiver or

SB 1540 7
36
trustee appointed by any state or federal court, syndicate,
37
or any other group or combination acting as a unit;
38
(10) "Qualified voters", for the purposes of elections
39
for the a p proval of sales taxes pursuant to section 67.617:
40
(a) Registered voters; or
41
(b) If no registered voters reside within the
42
conventi o n district, the owners of one or more parcels of
43
real property located within the convention district as
44
determined by the tax records of real property for the
45
county clerk as of the thirtieth day before the date of the
46
applicable election;
47
(11) "Registered voters", persons who reside within
48
the conve n tion district and who are qualified and registered
49
to vote pursuant to chapter 115, as determined by the
50
records of the election authority as of the thirtieth day
51
prior to the date of the applicable election;
52
[(8)] (12) "Transient guest", a person who occupies a
53
room or ro oms i n a hotel or motel for thirty-one days or
54
less during any calendar quarter.
1
67.607. Each regional convention and visitors
2
commission i s empowered to:
3
(1) Develop and execute plans, policies, and programs
4
exclusiv e ly to promote convention and tourist business
5
within the area of the city and county involved;
6
(2) Cooperate and act jointly with other agencies,
7
bureaus, boards, and associations to promote conventions and
8
tourist business within the area of the city and county
9
involved;
10
(3) Contract with any public or private agency,
11
individu a l, partnership, association, corporation or other
12
legal entity for the furnishing of services and supplies for

SB 1540 8
13
promotion of convention and tourist business within the city
14
and county involved;
15
(4) Lease and sublease[, for a period not to exceed
16
forty ye a rs, contract to bear the cost of operating] an
17
existing convention center, including any [adjoining
18
southern or eastward] expansion thereof, and to operate such
19
facilities; and to provide services to visitors to the area
20
of the city and county involved;
21
(5) Develop, devise, promote, fund or contribute to
22
the supp o rt of advertising and public relations campaigns
23
designed or intended to promote conventions and tourism in
24
the area of the city and county involved, or parts thereof;
25
(6) Contract for, or exact, a charge from any person
26
in conne c tion with the use, enjoyment, purchase, license, or
27
lease of any property or facility operated under lease by
28
the commission, or any activity, exhibit, function, or
29
personnel of the commission;
30
(7) Appoint a director and necessary assistants, to
31
fix thei r compensation and to remove such appointees;
32
(8) Execute contracts and sue and be sued;
33
(9) Contract with the county and city, or any
34
conventi o n and visitors bureau thereof, involved to allow
35
such county or city, or any convention and visitors bureau
36
thereof, to pay over to the commission the proceeds of any
37
convention and tourism tax or gross receipts tax on hotels
38
and motels imposed by such county or city for the purpose of
39
promoting conventions and tourism, or providing and
40
maintaining facilities therefor or sales tax on the amount
41
of sales or charges for rooms paid by transient guests of
42
hotels and motels imposed by such county or city pursuant to
43
section 67.657;

SB 1540 9
44
(10) Contract with any public or private agency,
45
individua l , partnership, association, corporation or other
46
legal entity to provide for limitations on marketing or use
47
or both of the facilities referred to in subdivision (4) of
48
this section or other special purpose civic facilities for
49
assembly, display and entertainment which are owned, leased
50
or operated, in whole or in part, by the city or the county;
51
(11) Exercise all powers, duties, rights, authority,
52
and all o b ligations on behalf of the regional convention and
53
sports complex authority created pursuant to section 67.650
54
and as set forth in sections 67.650 to 67.658, including,
55
but not limited to, those powers and duties set forth in
56
section 67.653;
57
(12) Develop, devise, promote, fund, or contribute to
58
the suppo r t and development of sports and entertainment
59
attractions, including, but not limited to, collegiate,
60
amateur, and professional sports;
61
(13) Levy and collect special assessments and taxes as
62
provided i n sections 67.601 to 67.626;
63
(14) Levy sales taxes pursuant to sections 67.601 to
64
67.626.
1
67.618. 1. The commission may by resolution levy one
2
or more spec i al a ssessments against real property within the
3
boundaries of the convention district, upon receipt of and
4
in accordance with a petition signed by:
5
(1) Owners of real property collectively owning more
6
than fif t y percent by assessed value of real property within
7
the boundaries of the convention district; and
8
(2) More than fifty percent per capita of the owners
9
of all r e al property within the boundaries of the convention
10
district.

SB 1540 10
11
2. The special assessment petition shall be in
12
substan t ially the following form:
13
The commission shall be authorized to levy
14
special assessments against real property within
15
the convention district (the "District") for the
16
purpose of providing revenue for maintenance,
17
construction, reconstruction, operations,
18
rehabilitation, installations, and financing of
19
improvements located within the District and
20
entering into one or more contracts related
21
thereto for any of the foregoing or any other
22
necessary or desirable improvement to be made
23
within such District, such special assessments
24
to be levied against each tract, lot, or parcel
25
of real property listed below within the
26
District which receives special benefit as a
27
result of such use of assessment, the cost of
28
which shall be allocated by _____ (insert method
29
of allocation, which shall be any reasonable
30
method including, but not limited to, the
31
imposition of an assessment upon the gross
32
revenue generated from charges for tickets,
33
passes, entrance fees, admission fees, or other
34
similar charges or impositions permitting the
35
attendance of events within the District, as
36
allocated and imposed on a reasonable basis),
37
with such special assessment to be in the
38
maximum amount of _____ (insert unit of
39
measurement, which may include, but not be
40
limited to, basing such measurement on gross
41
revenues generated from charges for tickets,
42
passes, entrance fees, admission tickets, or

SB 1540 11
43
similar charges). Such authorization to levy
44
the special assess ment shall expire on _____
45
(insert date). The tracts of land located in
46
the District wh ich will receive special benefits
47
from such service, projects, or improvements are
48
_____ (insert list of properties by common
49
addresses and legal descriptions).
50
3. The method for allocating such special assessments
51
shall s e t forth in the petition and may be any reasonable
52
method which results in imposing assessments upon real
53
property benefitted in relation to the benefit conferred
54
upon each respective tract, lot, or parcel of real property
55
and the cost to provide such benefit. The commission may
56
establish different classes, based on classification of real
57
property or any other reasonable basis, within the district
58
for purposes of special assessments. The levy rate for
59
special assessments may vary for eac h class or subclass.
60
4. By resolution, the commission may levy a special
61
assessm e nt rate lower than the rate ceiling set forth in the
62
petition authorizing the special assessment and may increase
63
such lowered special assessment rate to a level not
64
exceeding the special assessment rate ceiling set forth in
65
the petition without further approval of the real property
66
owners.
67
5. Each special assessment which is due and owing
68
shall c o nstitute a perpetual lien against each tract, lot,
69
or parcel of property from which it is derived. Such lien
70
may be foreclosed in the same manner as any oth e r special
71
assessment lien as provided in section 88.861.
72
Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsect i on and
73
section 67.1541 to the contrary, the county collector may,
74
upon certification by the commission, add each special

SB 1540 12
75
assessment to the annual real property tax bill for the
76
property and collect the assessment in the same manner the
77
collector uses for real property taxes. Any special
78
assessment remaining unpaid on the firs t day of January
79
annually is delinquent and enforcement of collection of the
80
delinquent bill by the county collector shall be governed by
81
the laws concerning delinquent and back taxes. The lien may
82
be foreclosed in the same manner as a tax upon real property
83
by land sale under chapter 140 or, if applicable to that
84
county, chapter 141.
85
6. A separate fund or account shall be created by the
86
commiss i on for each special assessment levied and each fund
87
or account shall be identifiable by a suitable title. The
88
proceeds of such assessment shall be credited to such fund
89
or account. Such fund or account shall be used solely to
90
pay the cost s incurred in undertaking the specified service
91
project.
92
7. Upon completion of the service or project, or both,
93
as set f orth in the petition, the balance remaining in the
94
fund or account established for such service or project or
95
both shall be returned or credited against the amount of the
96
original assessment of each parcel of property pro rata
97
based on the method of assessment of such special assessment.
98
8. Any moneys in a fund or account created pursuant to
99
this se c tion which are not needed for current expenditures
100
may be invested by the commission in accordance with
101
applicable laws relating to the investment of funds of the
102
city in which the convention district is located.
103
9. The authority of the district to levy special
104
assessm e nts shall be independent of the limitations and
105
authorities of the municipality in which it is located;

SB 1540 13
106
specifically, the provisions of section 88.812 shall not
107
apply to the commission.
108
10. In addition to the sales tax authorized in section
109
67.619, t he commission may impose by resolution a convention
110
district sales and use tax on all retail sales made in such
111
district which are subject to taxation pursuant to sections
112
144.010 to 144.525, except sales of motor vehicles,
113
trailers, boats or outboard motors, and sales to or by
114
public utilities and providers of communications, cable, or
115
video services. Any sales and use tax imposed pursuant to
116
this section may be imposed in increments of one-eighth of
117
one percent, up to a maximum of two percent. Such
118
convention district sales and use tax may be imposed for the
119
purpose designated by the commissioners of the commission in
120
its ballot of submission to its qualified voters; except
121
that, no resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall
122
become effective unless the commission submits to the
123
qualified voters of the convention district, by mail-in
124
ballot, a proposal to authorize a sales and use tax pursuant
125
to this section. If a majority of the votes cast by the
126
qualified voters on the proposed sales tax are in favor of
127
the sales tax, then the resolution is adopted. If a
128
majority of the votes cast by the qualified vo t ers are
129
opposed to the sales tax, then the resolution is void.
130
11. The ballot for the sales and use tax shall be in
131
substant i ally the following form:
132
Shall the regional convention and visitors
133
commission impose a convention district wide
134
sales and use tax at the maximum rate of ____
135
(insert amount) for the purpose of providing
136
revenue for the promotion of regional
137
convention and tourism and to support the

SB 1540 14
138
ongoing upkeep, maintenance, and operations of
139
the commission and its facilities, and any
140
other lawful purpose under sections 67.601 to
141
67.626?
142
□ YES □ NO
143
If you are in favor of the question, place an
144
"X" in the box opposite "YES". If you are
145
opposed to the question, place an "X" in the
146
box opposite "NO".
147
12. Within ten days after the qualified voters have
148
approved the imposition of the sales and use tax, the
149
commission shall, in accordance with section 32.087, notify
150
the director of the department of revenue. The sales and
151
use tax authorized by this section shall b e come effective on
152
the first day of the second calendar quarter after the
153
director of the department of revenue receives notice of the
154
adoption of such tax.
155
13. The penalties provided in sections 144.010 to
156
144.525 s hall apply to violations of this section.
157
Notwithstanding the provisions of chapter 115 to t h e
158
contrary, an election for the convention district sales and
159
use tax under subsection 8 of this section shall be
160
conducted in accordance with the provisions of this section.
1
67.651. As used in sections 67.650 to 67.658, the
2
following te r ms mean:
3
(1) "Authority", the regional convention and sports
4
complex a uthority created in section 67.650;
5
(2) "Bond", any bond, including refunding bonds,
6
notes, i n terim certificates, debentures, or other

SB 1540 15
7
obligations issued by an authority pursuant to section
8
67.653;
9
(3) "Chief executive", the mayor of the city and the
10
county e x ecutive of the county;
11
(4) "City", a constitutional charter city not within a
12
county;
13
(5) "Commission", the regional convention and visitors
14
commissi o n created in section 67.601;
15
(6) "County", a constitutional charter county
16
adjoinin g a constitutional charter city not within a county;
17
[(6)] (7) "Governing body", the board of aldermen
18
charged wi th g o verning the city and the county council
19
charged with governing the county;
20
[(7)] (8) "Multiple purposes", all purposes for which
21
a building ope r ated by the authority can legally be used,
22
including multiple sports;
23
[(8)] (9) "Transient guest", a person who occupies a
24
room or ro oms i n a hotel or motel for thirty-one days or
25
less during any calendar quarter.
1
67.652. 1. The authority shall consist of up to
2
eleven commi s sio n ers who shall be qualified voters of the
3
state of Missouri and residents of either the city or the
4
county. The commissioners first appointed shall be
5
appoint e d as follows:
6
(1) Up to three commissioners who shall be residents
7
of the c i ty may be appointed by the chief executive of the
8
city with the advice and consent of the board of aldermen;
9
(2) Up to three commissioners who shall be residents
10
of the c o unty may be appointed by the chief executive of the
11
county with the advice and consent of the county council; and
12
(3) Up to five commissioners one of whom shall be the
13
chairman , two of whom shall be a resident of the city, two

SB 1540 16
14
of whom shall be a resident of the county and one of whom
15
shall be a resident of the city, the county or a county
16
contiguous to the county, may be appointed by the governor
17
with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor
18
shall appoint one of the commissioners to b e the chairman of
19
the authority. Of the commissioners appointed by the chief
20
executive of t h e city, no more than two shall be of the same
21
political party, of the commissioners appointed by the chief
22
executive of the county, no more than two shall be of the
23
same political party and of the commissioners appointed by
24
the governor, no more than three shall be of the same
25
political party. In addition, no elective or appointed
26
official of the s tate of Missouri or of any political
27
subdivision thereof shall be a commissioner of the
28
authority. Upon the appointment of eight commissioners as
29
above prov i ded, the authority shall be deemed to be duly
30
constituted and shall be authorized to commence operations
31
as provided in sections 67.650 to 67.658; but, after the
32
authority is duly constituted nothing herein shall prohibit
33
the appointment of additional commissioners up to the limits
34
and in the manner provided in this section.
35
2. The commissioners shall serve for terms of six
36
years, e xcept that of the first such commissioners
37
appointed, the first person, if any, appointed by the
38
governor, the chief executive of the city and the chief
39
executive of the county, respectively, shall serve for terms
40
of two years, the next two persons, if any, appointed by the
41
governor, and the next person, if any, appointed by the
42
chief executive of the city and the chief executive of the
43
county, respectively, shall serve for terms of four years,
44
and the final persons, if any, appointed by the governor,
45
the chief executive of the city and the chief executive of

SB 1540 17
46
the county, respectively, shall serve for terms of six
47
years. Each commissioner shall hold office until his
48
succes s or has been appointed and qualified. No more than
49
six commissioners of the authority shall be of the same
50
political party.
51
3. In the event a vacancy exists or in the event a
52
commiss i oner's term expires, a successor commissioner shall
53
be appointed by whomever appointed the commissioner who
54
initially held the vacant position and if no person is so
55
selected within sixty days of the creation of the vacancy,
56
the unexpired term of such commissioner may be filled by a
57
majority vote of the remainder of the commissioners,
58
provided that such successor commissioner shall meet the
59
requirements set forth in subdivision (3) of subsection 1
60
above. Commissioners appointed to fill unexpired terms
61
shall o nly serve until such unexpired term expires. Pending
62
any such appointment to fill any vacancy, the remai n ing
63
commissioners may conduct authority business.
64
4. The authority shall elect from its number a
65
chairma n and may appoint such officers and employ such
66
employees as it may require for the performance of its
67
duties, and may fix and determine their qualifications,
68
duties and compensation. No action of the authority shall
69
be binding unless taken a t a meeting at which at least a
70
majority of the commissioners then appointed vote in favor
71
of such action. The commissioners shall be reimbursed by
72
the authority f o r the actual and necessary expenses incurred
73
in the performance of their duties.
74
5. In the event any of the state of Missouri, the city
75
or the c ounty fails to make any appropriation or to pay any
76
rents, fees or charges provided in any contract, agreement
77
lease or sublease between the authority and one or more of

SB 1540 18
78
the state of Missouri, the city and the county, the
79
commissioners, if any, appointed by the governor, if the
80
state of Missouri has failed to make such appropriation or
81
to pay such rents, fees or charges, and the commissioners,
82
if any, appointed by the chief executive of the city or
83
county, if the city or county, as applicable, has failed to
84
make such appropriation or to pay such rents, fees or
85
charges, shall be disqualified from voting on any matter,
86
action or resolution to come before the authority, and from
87
participating in any of the business of the authority, so
88
long as any such failure continues. If less than a majority
89
of the commissioners then appointed are thereby qualified to
90
vote, the commissioners that remain qualified to vote shall
91
constitute a quorum and any action of the authority which is
92
approved by a majority of such qualified commissioners,
93
shall be binding upon the authority.
94
6. Notwithstanding any provisions of this section to
95
the con t rary, beginning August 28, 2026, the terms of the
96
existing commissioners for the authority shall expire and
97
terminate and the members serving on the commission shall
98
serve as the new commissioners of the authority. Any
99
commissioner serving for the authority prior to A ugust 28,
100
2026, shall be replaced by the members of the commission
101
regardless of whether the terms of such commissioners have
102
expired. Each member serving on the commission shall serve
103
as a com m issioner for the authority, with such terms,
104
vacancies, and appointments handled in the same manner as
105
set forth in sections 67.601 to 67.626. Notwithstanding the
106
foregoing, four commissioners of the au t hority selected by
107
the governor that were previously appointed by the governor
108
and serving as of August 28, 2026, shall be reappointed as
109
of August 28, 2026, to serve as members of the newly

SB 1540 19
110
constituted commission in accordance with and pursuant to
111
the terms of section 67.601.
1
67.653. 1. The authority shall have the following
2
powers:
3
(1) To acquire by gift, bequest, purchase, lease or
4
sublease from public or private sources and to plan,
5
construct, operate and maintain, or to lease or sublease to
6
or from others for construction, operation and maintenance,
7
convention centers, sports stadiums, field houses, indoor
8
and outdoor convention, recreational, and entertainment
9
facilities and centers, playing fields, parking facilities
10
and other suitable concessions, and all things incidental or
11
necessary to a complex suitable for all types of convention,
12
entertainment and meeting activities and for all types of
13
sports and recreation, either professional or amateur,
14
commercial or private, either upon, above or below the
15
ground, except that no such stadium, complex or facility
16
shall be used, in any fashion, for the purpose of horse
17
racing or dog racing, and any stadium, complex or facility
18
newly constructed by the authority shall be suitable for
19
multiple purposes [and designed and constructed to meet
20
National Football League franchise standards and shall be
21
located adjacent to an existing convention facility];
22
(2) To adopt bylaws for the regulation of its affairs
23
and the c onduct of its business;
24
(3) To maintain an office, and to conduct its meetings
25
at such p lace or places in the city or in the county as it
26
may designate;
27
(4) To charge and collect fees and rents for use of
28
the faci l ities owned or operated by it or leased or
29
subleased from or to others and to deposit any funds
30
received under the provisions of sections 67.650 to 67.658

SB 1540 20
31
in a savings or checking account in a bank, credit union, or
32
savings and loan association in this state;
33
(5) To adopt a common seal;
34
(6) To contract and to be contracted with, including,
35
but with o ut limitation, the authority to enter into
36
contracts with cities, counties and other political
37
subdivisions and public agencies under sections 70.210 to
38
70.325, and otherwise, and to enter into contracts with
39
other entities, in connection with the acquisition by gift,
40
bequest, purchase, lease or sublease and in connection with
41
the planning, construction, financing, leasing, subleasing,
42
operation and maintenance of any convention or sports
43
facility and for any other lawful purpose, and to sue and to
44
be sued;
45
(7) To receive for its lawful activities any rentals,
46
contribu t ions or moneys appropriated or otherwise designated
47
for payment to the authority by municipalities, counties,
48
state or other political subdivisions or public agencies or
49
by the federal government or any agency or officer thereof
50
or from any other source;
51
(8) To disburse funds for its lawful activities and
52
fix sala r ies and wages of its officers and employees;
53
(9) To invest any of the authority's funds in such
54
types of investments as shall be determined by a resolution
55
adopted by the commissioners of the authority;
56
(10) To borrow money for the acquisition, planning,
57
construct i on, equipping, operation, maintenance, repair,
58
extension and improvement of any facility, or any part or
59
parts thereof, which it has the power to own, lease or
60
operate, and for any other proper corporate purpose, and to
61
issue negotiable notes, bonds, or other instruments in

SB 1540 21
62
writing as evidence of sums borrowed, as hereinafter
63
provided in this section:
64
(a) Bonds issued hereunder shall be issued pursuant to
65
a resolu t ion adopted by the commissioners of the authority
66
which shall set out the estimated cost to the authority of
67
the proposed facility or facilities, and shall further set
68
out the amount of bonds to be issued, their purpose or
69
purposes, their date or dates, denomination or
70
denominations, rate or rates of interest, time or times of
71
payment, both of principal and of interest, place or places
72
of payment and all other details in connection therewith.
73
Any such bonds may be subject to such provision for
74
redemption prior to maturity, with or without premium, and
75
at such times and upon such conditions as may be provided by
76
the resolution;
77
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 108.170,
78
such bon d s shall bear interest at such rate or rates
79
determined by the authority and shall mature within a period
80
not exceeding fifty years and may be sold at public or
81
private sale for not less than ninety-five percent of the
82
principal amount thereof. Bonds issued by the authority
83
shall possess all of the q ualities of negotiable instruments
84
under the laws of this state;
85
(c) Such bonds may be payable to bearer, may be
86
register e d or coupon bonds and if payable to bearer, may
87
contain such registration provisions as to either principal
88
and interest, or principal only, as may be provided in the
89
resolution authorizing the same, which resolution may also
90
provide for the exchange of registered and coupon bonds.
91
Such bonds and any coupons attached thereto shall be sig n ed
92
in such manner and by such officers of the authority as may
93
be provided for by the resolution authorizing the same. The

SB 1540 22
94
authority may provide for the replacement of any bond which
95
shall become mutilated, destroyed or lost;
96
(d) Bonds issued by the authority shall be payable as
97
to princ i pal, interest and redemption premium, if any, out
98
of all or any part of the general funds of the authority,
99
including rents, revenues, receipts and income derived and
100
to be derived for the use of any facility or combination of
101
facilities, or any part or parts thereof, acquired,
102
constructed, improved or extended in whole or in part from
103
the proceeds of such bonds, including but not limited to
104
convention center and stadium rentals, concessions, parking
105
facilities and from funds derived from any other facilities
106
or part or parts thereof, owned or operated by the
107
authority, all or any part of which rents, revenues,
108
receipts and income the authority is authorized to pledge
109
for the payment of said principal, interest, and redemption
110
premium, if any, except that direct appropriations of tax
111
revenues received by the authority pursuant to sections
112
67.656 and 67.657 or otherwise, other than appropriations
113
for the payment of rent, shall not be pledged for the
114
payment of such bonds. Neither the commissioners of the
115
authority nor any pers o n executing its bonds shall be
116
personally liable on such bonds by reason of the issuance
117
thereof. Bonds issued under the provisions of sections
118
67.653 t o 67.655 shall not constitute a debt, liability, or
119
obligation of this state, or any political subdivision of
120
this state, nor shall any such obligations be a pledge of
121
the faith and credit of this state, but shall be payable
122
solely from the revenues and assets held by the authority.
123
The issuance of bonds under sections 67.653 to 67.655 shal l
124
not, directly, indirectly, or contingently, obligate the
125
state of Missouri or any political subdivision thereof, or

SB 1540 23
126
the authority, to levy any form of taxation therefor or to
127
make any appropriation for their payment. Each obligation
128
or bond issued under sections 67.653 to 6 7 .655 shall contain
129
on the face thereof a statement to the effect that the
130
authority shall not be obligated to pay the same nor the
131
interest on such bond, except from the revenues received by
132
the authority or assets of the authority lawfully pledged
133
therefor, and that neither the faith and credit nor the
134
taxing power of this state or of any political subdivision
135
of this state is pledged to the payment of the principal of
136
or the interest on such obligation or bond. Bonds issued
137
pursuant to this section may be further sec u red by a
138
mortgage, deed of trust, trust agreement, pledge agreement,
139
assignment or security agreement upon the rents, revenues,
140
receipts and income herein referred to or any part thereof,
141
or upon any leasehold interest or other property owned by
142
the authority, or any part thereof, whether then owned or
143
thereafter acquired, except that direct appropriations of
144
tax revenues received by the authority pursuant to sections
145
67.656 and 67.657 or otherwise, other than appropriations
146
for the payment of rent, shall not secure such bonds. The
147
proceeds of such bonds shall be disbursed in such man n er and
148
under such restrictions as the authority may provide in the
149
resolution authorizing the issuance of such bonds or in any
150
such mortgage, deed of trust, trust agreement, pledge
151
agreement or security agreement;
152
(e) The authority shall fix and maintain rates and
153
rentals a nd make and collect charges for the use and
154
services of its interest in the facility or facilities or
155
any part thereof owned or operated by the authority which
156
shall be sufficient to pay the cost of operation and
157
maintenance thereof, to pay the principal of and interest on

SB 1540 24
158
any such bonds payable from such rates, rentals and charges
159
and to provide funds sufficient to meet all requirements of
160
the resolution by which such bonds have been issued;
161
(f) The resolution authorizing the issuance of any
162
such bon d s may provide for the allocation of rents,
163
revenues, receipts and income derived and to be derived by
164
the authority from the use of any facility or part thereof,
165
and of the proceeds received pursuant to sections 67.656 and
166
67.657, into such separate accounts as shall be deemed to be
167
advisable to assure the proper operation and maintenance of
168
any facility or part thereof and the prompt payment of any
169
bonds issued to finance all or any part of the costs
170
thereof. Such accounts may include reserve accounts
171
necessar y for the proper operation and maintenance of any
172
such facility or any part thereof, and for the payment of
173
any such bonds. Such resolution may include such other
174
covenants and a g reements by the authority as in its judgment
175
are advisable or necessary properly to secure the payment of
176
such bonds;
177
(g) The authority may issue negotiable refunding bonds
178
for the p urpose of refunding, extending or unifying the
179
whole or any part of such bonds then outstanding, or any
180
bonds, notes or other obligations issued by any other public
181
agency, public body or political subdivision in connection
182
with any facilities to be acquired, leased or subleased by
183
the authority, which refunding bonds shall not exceed the
184
amount necessary to refund the principal of the outstanding
185
bonds to be refunded and the accrued interest thereon to the
186
date of such refunding, together with any redemption
187
premium, amounts necessary to establish reserve and escrow
188
funds and all costs and expenses incurred in connection with
189
the refunding. The authority may provide for the payment of

SB 1540 25
190
interest on such refunding bonds at a rate in excess of the
191
bonds to be refunded;
192
(h) In case any of the commissioners or officers of
193
the auth o rity whose signatures appear on any bonds or
194
coupons shall cease to be such commissioners or officers
195
before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall,
196
nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the
197
same as if such commissioners or officers had remained in
198
office until such delivery;
199
(i) The authority is hereby declared to be performing
200
a public function and bonds of the authority are declared to
201
be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose
202
and, accordingly, interest thereon and income therefrom
203
shall be exempt from income taxation by the state of
204
Missouri;
205
(11) To condemn any and all rights or property of any
206
kind or c h aracter, necessary for the purposes of the
207
authority, in the manner provided in chapter 523, except
208
that no property now or hereafter vested in or held by the
209
state, the county or the city shall be taken by the
210
authority without the authorization or consent of such
211
party; provided however, that the authority shall provide
212
relocation benefits to all individuals and businesses,
213
occupying said property, in the same manner as such
214
relocation benefits are provided pursuant to the federal
215
Relocation Assistance Act;
216
(12) To perform all other necessary and incidental
217
functions , and to exercise such additional powers as shall
218
be conferred by the general assembly or by act of Congress.
219
2. The authority shall proceed to carry out its
220
duties, functions and powers in accordance with sections
221
67.650 to 67.658, and the authority is vested with all

SB 1540 26
222
necessary and appropriate powers not inconsistent with the
223
constitution or the laws of the United States to effectuate
224
the same, except the power to levy taxes or assessments. In
225
no event shall the state be liable for any deficiency or
226
indebtedness incurred by the authority.
227
3. The authority shall grant or award at least fifteen
228
percent of all contracts, employment opportunities,
229
professional services and all other special contracts to
230
persons who are members of a racial minority group, as
231
defined in section 37.013.
232
4. The authority and a ny city, county, other political
233
subdivi s ion or public agency obtaining funds pursuant to the
234
provisions of this chapter shall be subject to the
235
provisions of sections 34.073 and 34.076.
1
67.657. 1. Nothing contained in sections 67.650 to
2
67.658 shall imp a ir the powers of any county, municipality
3
or other political subdivision to acquire, own, operate,
4
develop or improve any facility of the type the authority is
5
given the right and power to own, operate, develop or
6
improve.
7
2. Any county, municipality or other political
8
subdivi s ion or public agency is authorized to make gifts,
9
donations, grants and contributions of money or real or
10
personal property to the authority, whether such money or
11
property is derived from tax revenues or from any other
12
source.
13
3. Prior to August 28, 2026, the state of Missouri or
14
any age n cy, department or instrumentality thereof and the
15
county, the city, or any political subdivision, public
16
agency or public body, or any combination thereof pursuant
17
to sections 70.210 to 70.325, or otherwise, are authorized
18
to enter into contracts, agreements, leases and subleases

SB 1540 27
19
with each other, the authority and others to acquire, sell,
20
convey, lease, sublease, own, operate, finance, develop or
21
improve, or any combination thereof, any facility of the
22
type the authority is given the right to construct, own,
23
operate, develop or improve, including without limitation to
24
agree to pay rents or other fees or charges, subject to
25
annual appropriations, and to mortgage, pledge, assign,
26
convey, or grant security in any interest which any such
27
entity may have in such facility.
28
4. In addition to any other tax imposed by law, and
29
notwith s tanding the provisions of subdivision (2) of
30
subsection 5 of section 67.619, to the contrary, the
31
governing body of the county may submit to the voters of the
32
county a tax not to exceed three and one-half percent on the
33
amount of sales or charges for all sleeping rooms paid by
34
the transient guests of hotels and motels situated within
35
the county involved, and doing business within such county
36
for the purpose of funding a regional convention and sports
37
complex authority and for other recreational and
38
entertainment purposes. If the governing body so orders,
39
the election officials o f the county shall submit a
40
proposition to the voters of such county at the next
41
statewide or countywide election or at a special election
42
called for that purpose, such special election to be held at
43
the expense of the regional convention and sports complex
44
authority. Such proposition shall be submitted to the
45
voters in s ubstantially the following form at such election:
46
Shall a sales tax of ______ percent on the amount
47
of sales or charges for all rooms paid by the
48
transient guests of hotels and motels be levied in
49
the county of ______ to provide certain funds for

SB 1540 28
50
the regional convention and sports complex
51
authority and for general revenue purposes?
52
□ YES □ NO
53
In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such
54
proposition in such county at such election approve such
55
proposition, then such sales tax shall be in full force and
56
effect as of the first day of the calendar quarter following
57
the calendar quarter in which the election was held.
58
5. On and after the effective day of any tax
59
authori z ed under the provisions of subsection 4 of this
60
section, the governing body of the county may adopt one of
61
the two following provisions for the collection and
62
administration of the tax:
63
(1) The collector of revenue in such county may
64
collect t he tax pursuant to rules and regulations
65
promulgated by the governing body of the county. The tax to
66
be collected by the collector of revenue, less a n amount not
67
less than one percent and not more than three percent which
68
may be retained for costs of collection, shall be remitted
69
to the county and deposited in a special trust fund to be
70
known as the "County Convention and Recreation Trust Fund"
71
not later than thirty days following the end of each month;
72
(2) The governing body of the county may enter into an
73
agreemen t with the director of revenue of the state of
74
Missouri for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in
75
subsection 4 of this section. In the event the governing
76
body enters into an agreement with the director of revenue
77
of the state of Missouri for the collection of the tax
78
authorized in subsection 4 of this section, the director of
79
revenue shall perform all functions incident to the

SB 1540 29
80
administration, collection, enforcement, and operation of
81
such tax, and the director of revenue shall collect such
82
additional tax. The tax shall be collected and reported
83
upon such forms and under such administrative rules and
84
regulations as may be prescribed by the director of revenue,
85
and the director of revenue shall retain not less than one
86
percent nor more than three percent for cost of collection
87
and shall transfer all other moneys collected for such tax
88
to the county for deposit in the county convention and
89
recreation trust fund.
90
6. All funds deposited in the county convention and
91
recreat i on trust fund shall, subject to annual
92
appropriation, be disbursed by the county only for [deposit
93
in the regional convention and sports complex fund], first,
94
to pay the county's share of any rent, fees or charges
95
payable pursuant to any contract, agreement, lease or
96
sublease provided for in subsection 3 of this section[;
97
provided that in the event the county chooses to participate
98
in a qualifying project and enters into any such contract,
99
agreement, lease or sublease, then any funds in excess of
100
its obligations hereunder which are deposited in the county
101
convention and recreation trust fund in any year pursuant to
102
subsection 4 of this section may be appropriated and
103
disbursed by the county for general revenue purposes.
104
7. Notwithstanding any provision of subsection 6 of
105
this se c tion to the contrary, funds deposited in the county
106
convention and recreation trust fund pursuant to subsection
107
5 of this section in excess of amounts payable as the
108
county's share of any rent, fees or charges payable pursuant
109
to any contract, agreement, lease or sublease provided for
110
in subsection 3 of this section, including reasonable
111
reserves for future payments of such amounts, shall not be

SB 1540 30
112
appropriated or paid except for funding of the regional
113
convention and sports complex authority or for regional
114
convention and tourism purposes to the regional convention
115
and visitors commission established by section 67.601 if it
116
is providing management and operations services for a
117
facility of the regional convention and sports complex
118
authority of which the state of Missouri, the city, and St.
119
Louis County are lessees pursuant to a contract, agreement
120
or sublease with such lessees], and the remainder, if any,
121
annually to the regional convention and visitors commission
122
established by section 67.601.
123
7. Provided that the county's share of any rent, fees,
124
or char g es due and payable pursuant to any contract,
125
agreement, lease, or sublease provided for in subsection 3
126
of this section have been made, all funds on deposit in the
127
county convention and recreation trust fund as of August 28,
128
2026, shall be deemed excess funds and may be appropriated
129
and disbursed by the county for general revenue purposes.
130
Beginning August 28, 2026, all funds deposited in the cou n ty
131
convention and recreation trust fund shall be distributed in
132
accordance with subsection 6 of this section such that all
133
excess funds shall be remitted to the regional convention
134
and visitors commission established by section 67.601 for
135
the sole use by, and control of, such commission. No funds
136
generated by the tax imposed by this section shal l be used
137
for the payment or support of the county's share of any
138
rent, fees, or other charges payable pursuant to any
139
contract, agreement, lease, or sublease entered into,
140
modified, or amended after August 28, 2026, pursuant to
141
subsection 3 of this section.
142
8. In addition to any other tax imposed by law, and
143
notwith s tanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of

SB 1540 31
144
subsection 5 of section 67.619 to the contrary, the
145
governing body of the city may repeal a present two-dollar
146
license fee per occupied room levied in such city on hotels
147
and motels and submit to the voters of the city a tax not to
148
exceed three and one-half percent on the amount of sales or
149
charges for all sleeping rooms paid by the transient guests
150
of hotels and motels situated within the city involved, and
151
doing business within such city for the purposes of funding
152
debt service, lease payments or other expenses of an
153
existing convention center, including any southern expansion
154
thereof, of such city, a regional convention and sports
155
complex authority or a regional convention and visitors
156
commission or any combination thereof as herein provided.
157
If the governing body so orders, the election officials o f
158
the city shall submit a proposition to the voters of such
159
city at the next statewide or citywide election or at a
160
special election called for that purpose, such special
161
election to be held at the expense of the city. Such
162
proposition shall be submitted to the voters in
163
substantially the following form at such election:
164
Shall the present two-dollar license fee per occupied
165
room levied in the city of ______ on hotels and motels
166
be repealed and a sales tax of ______ percent on the
167
amount of sales or charges for all rooms paid by the
168
transient guests of hotels and motels be levied in the
169
city of ______ to provide funds for convention,
170
tourism and sports facilities purposes and agencies?
171
□ YES □ NO
172
In the event that a majority of the voters voting on such
173
proposition in such city at such election approve such

SB 1540 32
174
proposition, then such two-dollar license fee per occupied
175
room shall be repealed and such sales tax shall be in full
176
force and effect as of the first day of the calendar quarter
177
following the calendar quarter in which the election was
178
held.
179
9. On and after the effective date of any tax
180
authori z ed under the provisions of subsection 8 of this
181
section, the governing body of the city may adopt one of the
182
two following provisions for the collection and
183
administration of the tax:
184
(1) The collector of revenue in such city may collect
185
the tax p ursuant to rules and regulations promulgated by the
186
governing body of the city. The tax to be collected by the
187
collector of revenue, less a n amount not less than one
188
percent and not more than three percent which may be
189
retained for costs of collection, shall be remitted to the
190
city and deposited in a special trust fund to be known as
191
the "City Convention and Sports Facility Trust Fund" not
192
later than thirty days following the end of each month;
193
(2) The governing body of the city may enter into an
194
agreemen t with the director of revenue of the state of
195
Missouri for the purpose of collecting the tax authorized in
196
subsection 8 of this section. In the event the governing
197
body enters into an agreement with the director of revenue
198
of the state of Missouri for the collection of the tax
199
authorized in subsection 8 of this section, the director of
200
revenue shall perform all functions incident to the
201
administration, collection, enforcement and operation of
202
such tax, and the director of revenue shall collect such
203
additional tax. The tax shall be collected and reported
204
upon such forms and under such administrative rules and
205
regulations as may be prescribed by the director of revenue,

SB 1540 33
206
and the director of revenue shall retain not less than one
207
percent nor more than three percent for cost of collection
208
and shall transfer all other moneys collected for such tax
209
to the city for deposit in the convention and sports
210
facility trust fund.
211
10. All funds deposited in the city convention and
212
sports f a cility trust fund shall, subject to annual
213
appropriation, be disbursed by the city only for first, debt
214
service, lease payments or other expenses related to an
215
existing convention center, including any [southern]
216
expansion thereof, of such city, second, to pay the city's
217
share of any rent, fees or charges payable pursuant to any
218
lease provided for in subsection 3 of this section and
219
third, the remainder, if any, annually to the regional
220
convention and visitors commission established by section
221
67.601 [if it is providing management and operations
222
services for a facility of the regional convention and
223
sports complex authority of which the state of Missouri, the
224
city, and St. Louis County are lessees pursuant to a
225
contract, agreement or sublease with such lessees].
1
99.585. 1. The state of Missouri, acting through the
2
department o f ec o nomic development and the office of
3
administration, or any other public body may, upon such
4
terms and with reasonable consideration as it may determine,
5
expend funds for the purpose of aiding and cooperating in
6
the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of a land
7
clearance project or projects within the area in which the
8
public body is authorized to act, or expend funds for the
9
purpose of aiding and cooperating in the planning,
10
undertaking, or carrying out of a project or projects within
11
or upon any area, property, or facilities owned, managed,
12
leased, maintained, or operated by a regional convention and

SB 1540 34
13
visitors commission, to develop, construct, reconstruct,
14
rehabilitate, repair, or improve any tourism infrastructure
15
facilities existing as of August 28, 2019, and for which
16
application is made and approved by the department of
17
economic development no later than August 28, [2020] 2028.
18
Any annual expenditure by a public body for such land
19
clearance projects or regional convention and visitors
20
commission projects related to tourism infrastructure
21
facilities shall be limited to a portion of tax revenues
22
derived directly or indirectly from any such land clearance
23
project or projects or regional convention and visitors
24
commission project or projects supported by such annual
25
expenditure within such designated land clearance project
26
area or areas or such area or areas owned, managed, leased,
27
maintained, or operated by a regional convention and
28
visitors commission, as stated in an agreement entered into
29
between the authority and the public body under subdivision
30
(10) of section 99.580 or section 67.607, as applicable;
31
provided, however, that:
32
(1) The term of state appropriations under any such
33
agreemen t entered into prior to August 28, 2021, shall not
34
exceed twenty years, and for any agreement entered into
35
between August 28, 2021, and August 28, 2028, shall not
36
exceed thirty years;
37
(2) The annual amount of the state appropriation
38
authoriz e d under this section shall not exceed two million
39
five hundred thousand dollars per year for any fiscal year
40
ending on or before June 30, 2031, and four million five
41
hundred thousand dollars per year for any fiscal year
42
thereafter. No such appropriation shall be made prior to
43
July 1, 2021 ;

SB 1540 35
44
(3) Any such land clearance project or regional
45
conventi o n and visitors commission project shall be
46
determined to produce a positive net fiscal impact for the
47
state over the term of such agreement, with such public or
48
private assurances as the director of the department of
49
economic development may reasonably require; and
50
(4) The director of the department of economic
51
developm e nt shall make an annual written report on behalf of
52
the department to the governor and the general assembly
53
within ninety days of the end of each fiscal year detailing
54
whether such land clearance project or such regional
55
convention and visitors commission project produced a
56
positive net fiscal impact for the state in the prior fiscal
57
year and projecting the overall net fiscal impact to the
58
state over the term of such agreement.
59
(5) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (2)
60
of this s ubsection to the contrary, for any regional
61
convention and visitors commission projects as described in
62
subsection 1 of this section, the annual appropriation
63
amount shall not exceed four million dollars per year for
64
any fiscal year. No such appropriation shall be made prior
65
to July 1, 2027, for any tourism infrastructure facilities
66
located in a convention district.
67
2. As used in this section, "tourism infrastructure
68
facilit i es" means structures, fixtures, systems, and
69
facilities of multipurpose sports and entertainment venues
70
with seating capacity less than twenty-five thousand,
71
including associated parking facilities, owned by any public
72
body and which the authority determines are a contributing
73
factor in the attraction of sports, recreational,
74
entertainment, or meeting activities, either professional or
75
amateur, commercial or private. Such structures, fixtures,

SB 1540 36
76
systems, and facilities may include, but are not limited to,
77
foundations, roofs, interior and exterior walls or windows,
78
floors, steps, stairs, concourses, hallways, restrooms,
79
event or meeting spaces or other hospitality-related areas,
80
concession or food preparation areas, and services systems
81
such as mechanical, gas utility, electrical, lighting,
82
communication, sound, sanitary, HVAC, elevator, escalator,
83
plumbing, sprinkler, cabling and wiring, life-safety
84
security cameras, access deterrents, public safety
85
improvements, or other building systems. "Tourism
86
infrastructure facilities" shall also in c lude any existing
87
convention center, including any expansion thereof, or any
88
sports stadiums, field houses, indoor and outdoor
89
convention, recreational, and entertainment facilities and
90
centers, playing fields, parking facilities and other
91
suitable concessions, and all things incidental or necessary
92
to a complex suitable for all types of convention,
93
entertainment, and meeting activities and for all types of
94
sports and recreation, that is owned, leased, operated,
95
maintained, or managed by the regional convention and
96
visitors commission as provided in sections 67.601 to
97
67.626, along with any of the aforementioned structures,
98
systems, and facilities associated therewith.
99
3. For any land clearance project for which funds are
100
expende d under this section on a facility utilized by a
101
professional sports franchise, if the owners of such
102
franchise relocate the franchise to another state during the
103
period of the agreement entered into under subsection 1 of
104
this section, such owners shall repay to the general revenue
105
fund the amount of funds expended by the state pursuant to
106
such agreement.
